fr_vi.foma
# FRENCH SOUND INVENTORY
# The French vowels system consists of 12 oral vowels and 4 nasal vowels
define frOralVowels [ i | y | e | ø | ɛ | œ | ə | a | u | o | ɔ | ɑ ];
define frNasalVowels [ ɛ̃ | œ̃ | ɔ̃ | ɑ̃ ];

# Set of French consonants
define frCons [ p | b | t | d | k | g | m | n | ɲ | ŋ | f | v | s | z | ʃ | ʒ | ʁ |  w | l | j | ɥ ];
define frLabials [ p | b | f | m ];
define frDentals [ t | d | s | z | n | l ];
define frNasals [ m | n | ɲ | ŋ ];
define frSounds [frOralVowels | frNasalVowels | frCons];

# VIETNAMESE SOUND INVENTORY
# Set of Vietnamese vowels
define viVowels [ i | e | ɛ | ɨ | ə | ə̆ | a | ă | u | o | ɔ | iə̯ | ɨə̯ | uə̯ ];
define viCons [ p | ɓ | t | tʰ | ɗ | c | k | ʔ |  m | n | ɲ | ŋ | f | v | s | z | x | ɣ | h | w | l | r ];
define viSounds [viVowels | viCons];

# PHONOLOGICAL ADAPTATION PATTERNS

# Mappings for consonants

# Context-free mappings.
define bChange [ b -> ɓ ];
define dChange [ d -> ɗ ];
define gChange [ g -> ɣ ];
define trChange [ t ʁ -> c ];
define rChange [ ʁ -> r ];
define postAlveolarChange [ ʃ -> s , ʒ -> z ];
define contextFreeMappings [ bChange .o. dChange .o. gChange .o. trChange .o. rChange .o. postAlveolarChange ];

# Onset and coda changes for consonants.
define rCodaChange [ ʁ -> k || _ .#. ];
define labialCodaChange [ [ frLabials - m ] -> p || _ .#. ];
define dentalCodaChange [ [ frDentals - [ n | l ] ] -> t || _ .#. ];
define velarCodaChange [ [ k | g ] -> k || _ .#. ];
define nlCodaChange [ [ n | l ] -> n || _ .#. ];
define postAlveolarCodaChange [ [ ʃ | ʒ ] -> t || _ .#. ];
define codaMappings [ rCodaChange .o. labialCodaChange .o. dentalCodaChange .o. velarCodaChange .o. nlCodaChange .o. postAlveolarCodaChange ];

# Vowel mappings
define roundedHigh [ y -> w i ]; # could also be u, i
define roundedMidFront [ ø -> ə , œ -> ə ];
define nasalVowels [ ɛ̃ -> ɛ ŋ , ɑ̃ -> ɑ̃ ŋ , ɔ̃ -> o ŋ ];

# Tone application (applied at the end)
# define RisingTone [ 0 -> 1 || [p | t | k] _ , [p | t | k] "." _ ];
# define defaultToHighLevel [ 0 -> "0" || _ .#. , _ "." ]; 
# define toneChange [ RisingTone .o. defaultToHighLevel ];
# Need syllabification to work.


# Rule composition
re [ codaMappings .o. roundedHigh .o. roundedMidFront .o. nasalVowels .o. contextFreeMappings ];
